Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB33.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 218A.1421 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in marijuana when he or she knowingly and
unlawfully traffics in more than eight (8) ounces of marijuana, and the trafficking
is not in compliance with, or otherwise authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B.
(2) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, [trafficking in less than eight (8) ounces
of marijuana is:
(a) For a first offense a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class D felony.
(3) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B,] trafficking in more than eight (8)[ or
more] ounces but less than five (5) pounds of marijuana is:
(a) For a first offense a Class D felony.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class C felony.
(3)[(4)] Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, trafficking in five (5) or more
pounds of marijuana is:
(a) For a first offense a Class C felony.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class B felony.
(4)[(5)] Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, the unlawful possession by any
person of more than eight (8) [or more ]ounces of marijuana shall be prima facie
evidence that the person possessed the marijuana with the intent to sell or transfer
it.
(5)[(6)] This section does not apply to:
(a) A cannabis business or a cannabis business agent, as defined in KRS
218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; or
(b) A cardholder, as defined in KRS 218B.010, whose use of medicinal cannabis
is in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B.
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
Section 2. KRS 218A.1422 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of marijuana when he or she knowingly
and unlawfully possesses marijuana, and the possession is not in compliance with,
or otherwise authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B in excess of:
(a) Eight (8) ounces; or
(b) Five (5) plants.
(2) Possession of marijuana is a Class A[Class B] misdemeanor, except that, KRS
Chapter 532 to the contrary notwithstanding, the maximum term of incarceration
shall be no greater than forty-five (45) days.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A cannabis business or a cannabis business agent, as defined in KRS
218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; or
(b) A cardholder, as defined in KRS 218B.010, whose use of medicinal cannabis
is in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B.
Section 3. KRS 218A.1423 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of marijuana cultivation when he or she knowingly and
unlawfully plants, cultivates, or harvests more than five (5) plants of marijuana
with the intent to sell or transfer it, and the cultivation is not in compliance with, or
otherwise authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B.
(2) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, marijuana cultivation[ of five (5) or more
plants of marijuana] is:
(a) For a first offense a Class D felony.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class C felony.
(3) [Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, marijuana cultivation of fewer than five
(5) plants is:
(a) For a first offense a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class D felony.
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
(4) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, ]The planting, cultivating, or harvesting
of more than five (5)[ or more] marijuana plants shall be prima facie evidence that
the marijuana plants were planted, cultivated, or harvested for the purpose of sale or
transfer.
(4)[(5)] This section does not apply to a cannabis business or a cannabis business
agent, as defined in KRS 218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter
218B.
Section 4. KRS 218A.276 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A court may request the Division of Probation and Parole to perform a risk and
needs assessment for any person found guilty of unlawful possession of marijuana
pursuant to KRS 218A.1422, synthetic drugs pursuant to KRS 218A.1430, or salvia
pursuant to KRS 218A.1451. The assessor shall make a recommendation to the
court as to whether treatment is indicated by the assessment, and, if so, the most
appropriate treatment or recovery program environment. If treatment is indicated
for the person, the court may order him or her to the appropriate treatment or
recovery program as indicated by the assessment that will effectively respond to the
person's level of risk, criminal risk factors, and individual characteristics as
designated by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services where a
program of treatment or recovery not to exceed ninety (90) days in duration may be
prescribed. The person ordered to the designated treatment or recovery program
shall present himself or herself for registration and initiation of the treatment or
recovery program within five (5) days of the date of sentencing. If, without good
cause, the person fails to appear at the designated treatment or recovery program
within the specified time, or if any time during the program of treatment or
recovery prescribed, the authorized director of the treatment or recovery program
finds that the person is unwilling to participate in his or her treatment, the director
shall notify the sentencing court. Upon receipt of notification, the court shall cause
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
the person to be brought before it and may continue the order of treatment, or may
rescind the treatment order and impose a sentence for the possession offense. Upon
discharge of the person from the treatment or recovery program by the secretary of
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or his or her designee, prior to the
expiration of the ninety (90) day period or upon satisfactory completion of ninety
(90) days of treatment, the person shall be deemed finally discharged from
sentence. The secretary, or his or her designee, shall notify the sentencing court of
the date of such discharge from the treatment or recovery program.
(2) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or his or her designee,
shall inform each court of the identity and location of the treatment or recovery
program to which a person sentenced by that court under this chapter shall be
initially ordered.
(3) In the case of a person ordered to an inpatient facility for treatment pursuant to this
chapter, transportation to the facility shall be provided by order of the court when
the court finds the person unable to convey himself or herself to the facility within
five (5) days of sentencing by reason of physical infirmity or financial incapability.
(4) The sentencing court shall immediately notify the designated treatment or recovery
program of the sentence and its effective date.
(5) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or his or her designee,
may authorize transfer of the person from the initially designated treatment or
recovery program to another treatment or recovery program for therapeutic
purposes. The sentencing court shall be notified of termination of treatment by the
terminating treatment or recovery program and shall be notified by the secretary or
his or her designee of the new treatment or recovery program to which the person
was transferred.
(6) Responsibility for payment for treatment services rendered to persons pursuant to
this section shall be as under the statutes pertaining to payment by patients and
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
others for services rendered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, unless
the person and the treatment or recovery program shall arrange otherwise.
(7) None of the provisions of this section shall be deemed to preclude the court from
exercising its usual discretion with regard to ordering probation, presumptive
probation, or conditional discharge.
(8) In the case of any person who has been convicted of unlawful possession of
marijuana, synthetic drugs, or salvia, the court may set aside and void the
conviction upon satisfactory completion of treatment, probation, or other sentence,
and issue to the person a certificate to that effect. A conviction voided under this
subsection shall not be deemed a first offense for purposes of this chapter or
deemed a conviction for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law
upon conviction of a crime.
(9) If the court voids a conviction under this section, the court shall order the sealing of
all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other
agency or official, including law enforcement records, except as provided in KRS
27A.099. The court shall order the sealing on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts. Every agency with records relating to the
arrest, charge, or other matters arising out of the arrest or charge that is ordered to
seal records, shall certify to the court within sixty (60) days of the entry of the order
that the required sealing action has been completed.
(10) After the sealing of the record, the proceedings in the matter shall not be used
against the defendant. The court and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that
no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is sealed shall not have to
disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for
employment, credit, or other type of application.
(11) Inspection of the sealed records may thereafter be permitted by the court or upon a
motion by the person who is the subject of the records and only to those persons
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
named in the motion.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible conviction" means any criminal conviction for a violation of
Section 2 of this Act, subsection (2) of Section 1 of this Act, or Section 3 of
this Act, or a conviction for an offense prior to July 14, 1992, for
possession, cultivation, or trafficking of marijuana which was punishable
by not more than five (5) years incarceration;
(b) "Expungeable conviction" means any eligible conviction for which the
available record does not indicate that the offense involved a quantity of
marijuana in excess of the personal use quantity of marijuana; and
(c) "Personal use quantity of marijuana" means:
1. Eight (8) ounces or less of marijuana; or
2. Five (5) or fewer plants of marijuana.
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a process for identifying
all eligible convictions and communicating each eligible conviction to the court
in which the conviction occurred, and to the office of the Commonwealth's
attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case. All eligible convictions shall
be communicated to the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county
attorney that prosecuted the case within ninety (90) days of the effective date of
this Act.
(3) Within ninety (90) days of the receipt of an eligible conviction, the office of the
Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case may file
with the court in which the conviction occurred an objection to the expungement
of any eligible conviction which is not an expungeable conviction.
(4) Within two hundred (200) days of the effective date of this Act, for any eligible
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
conviction to which the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney
that prosecuted the case has not filed an objection, the court shall order the
judgment vacated, dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible for
expungement under this section, and order expunged all records in the custody of
the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including
law enforcement records.
(5) (a) Any person who has an eligible conviction prior to the effective date of this
Act and whose records have not been expunged under subsection (4) of this
section may, at any time after one (1) year after the effective date of this Act,
petition the court in which the conviction occurred to expunge all eligible
convictions.
(b) There shall be no filing fee for a petition under this subsection.
(c) An expungement petition brought under this subsection shall be served
upon the offices of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that
prosecuted the case, and the court shall notify the Commonwealth's
attorney or county attorney of an opportunity for a response to the petition.
The response shall be filed within ninety (90) days after the filing of the
petition.
(d) If a response is not filed within ninety (90) days after the filing of the
petition, the court shall order the judgment vacated and dismiss with
prejudice any charges which are eligible for expungement under this
section.
(e) If a response is filed objecting to the expungement of the eligible conviction,
the court shall, within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the objection,
schedule a hearing on the petition. If, at the hearing, the court finds that the
eligible conviction is an expungeable conviction, the court shall order the
judgment vacated and dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 956
for expungement under this section.
(6) Upon entry of an order vacating and expunging a conviction, the original
conviction shall be vacated and the record shall be expunged. The court and
other agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed from their computer
systems so that the matter shall not appear on official state-performed
background checks. The court and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that
no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is expunged shall not
have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an
application for employment, credit, or other type of application. If the expunged
conviction was a felony and the person is not prohibited from voting for any other
reason, the person's ability to vote shall be restored and the person may register
to vote.
(7) On or before December 1, 2025, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
provide a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary providing data by county on the numbers
of eligible convictions identified, objections filed with the court, and the number
of expungements granted.
(8) This section shall be retroactive.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 12/26/2024 8:56 AM Jacketed